Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1326.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1361(1) and 1366 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1361. When Provided.--(1) The board of school directors in any school district may, out of the funds of the district, provide for the free transportation of any resident pupil to and from the kindergarten, elementary school, or secondary school in which he is lawfully enrolled, provided that such school is not operated for profit and is either located <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 within the district boundaries or located within this Commonwealth but outside the district boundaries at a distance not exceeding ten miles by the nearest public highway, except that such ten-mile limit shall not apply to area career and technical schools which regularly serve eligible district pupils or to special schools and classes approved by the Department of Education, and to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips for any purpose connected with the educational pursuits of the pupils. When provision is made by a board of school directors for the transportation of public school pupils to and from such schools or to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips as herein provided, the board of school directors shall also make identical provision for the free transportation of pupils who regularly attend nonpublic kindergarten, elementary and high schools not operated for profit to and from such schools or to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips as herein provided. Such transportation of pupils attending nonpublic schools shall be provided during regular school hours on such dates and periods that the nonpublic school not operated for profit is in regular session, according to the school calendar officially adopted by the directors of the same in accordance with provisions of law. The board of school directors shall provide such transportation whenever so required by any of the provisions of this act or of any other act of Assembly.* * *SECTION 1. SECTION 1366 OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, IS AMENDED TO READ:20250HB1326PN1647 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1366. Computation of Distances.--Where, by the terms of this act, or any other act, any distance is specified between the residence of any pupil and any public school to be attended by him, or any transportation is provided for within or beyond any particular distance, in computing such distance no allowance shall be made for the distance that the dwelling house of the pupil is situated off the public highway. All such distances shall be computed by the public highway from the nearest point where a private way or private road connects the dwelling house of the pupil with the highway to the nearest point where said highway touches the school grounds of the school to which the pupil has been assigned. The computation of distances may be made utilizing technology capable of accurate measurements of distances. The Department of Education may not require manual recording for distance reporting.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2541.1. Pupil Transportation Data.--(a) Beginning with the information reported for the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, each school entity entitled to reimbursement on account of pupil transportation shall provide in a format prescribed by the Department of Education, AND IN A METHOD THAT IS NOT REDUNDANT OR OVERLY BURDENSOME FOR SCHOOL ENTITIES, the following data pertaining to pupil transportation: (1) For students enrolled in the school entity and eligible to receive free pupil transportation services from the school entity:(i) The total number of students receiving pupil transportation services from the school entity.(ii) The total number of students experiencing homelessness as defined in the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (Public 20250HB1326PN1647 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Law 100-77, 101 Stat. 482) and as determined by the school entity. ENTITY, THE TOTAL NUMBER OF STUDENTS RECEIVING PUPIL TRANSPO RTATION SERVICES FROM THE SCHOOL ENTITY. (2) For each vehicle, an indicator of whether the vehicle was used to provide extraordinary transportation established in direct response to the severe health needs of the individual student EXPENSES . (3) For students enrolled in a charter school and eligible to receive free pupil transportation services from the school entity:(i) The total number of students receiving pupil transportation services from the school entity.(ii) The total number of students experiencing homelessness as defined in the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act and as determined by the school entity.(iii) (II) The school entity's pupil transportation expenditures related to students enrolled in a charter school and receiving pupil transportation services from the school entity. The Department of Education shall provide guidance for school entities on how to either track the actual costs to transport charter school students or determine a method of allocating a portion of the total transportation costs applicable to the transportation of charter school students. (4) For students enrolled in a nonpublic school and eligible to receive free pupil transportation services from the school entity:(i) The total number of students receiving pupil transportation services from the school entity.(ii) The total number of students experiencing homelessness as defined in the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act and as 20250HB1326PN1647 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determined by the school entity.(iii) (II) The school entity's pupil transportation expenditures related to students enrolled in a nonpublic school and receiving pupil transportation services from the school entity. The Department of Education shall provide guidance for school entities on how to either track the actual costs to transport nonpublic school students or determine a method of allocating a portion of the total transportation costs applicable to the transportation of nonpublic school students. (5) For students enrolled in the school entity, nonpublic school or charter school and ineligible for reimbursement for pupil transportation services but receive pupil transportation services from the school entity:(i) The total number of students receiving pupil transportation services from the school entity.(ii) The school entity's pupil transportation expenditures related to students enrolled in the school entity, nonpublic school or charter school and ineligible to receive free pupil transportation services from the school entity but are receiving pupil transportation services from the school entity. The Department of Education shall provide guidance for school entities on how to either track the actual costs to transport ineligible students or determine a method of allocating a portion of the total transportation costs applicable to the transportation of ineligible students.(6) FOR STUDENTS ENROLLED IN A SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL LOCATED OUTSIDE OF THE BOUNDARIES OF THIS COMMONWEALTH AND ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE FREE PUPIL TRANSPORTATION SERVICES FROM THE SCHOOL ENTITY:(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF STUDENTS RECEIVING PUPIL 20250HB1326PN1647 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TRANSPORTATION SERVICES FROM THE SCHOOL ENTITY.(II) THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S PUPIL TRANSPORTATION EXPENDITURES RELATED TO STUDENTS ENROLLED IN A SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL LOCATED OUTSIDE OF THE BOUNDARIES OF THIS COMMONWEALTH AND RECEIVING PUPIL TRANSPORTATION SERVICES FROM THE SCHOOL ENTITY. THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL PROVIDE GUIDANCE FOR SCHOOL ENTITIES ON HOW TO EITHER TRACK THE ACTUAL COSTS TO TRANSPORT THESE SCHOOL STUDENTS OR DETERMINE A METHOD OF ALLOCATING A PORTION OF THE TOTAL TRANSPORTATION COSTS APPLICABLE TO THE TRANSPORTATION OF STUDENTS ATTENDING A SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL LOCATED OUTSIDE OF THE BOUNDARIES OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(A.1) EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL REPORT THE FOLLOWING:(1) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF STUDENTS EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS AT ANY POINT IN THE SCHOOL YEAR.(2) THE TYPE OF SCHOOL ENTITY THAT THE STUDENTS EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS WERE TRANSPORTED TO AND FROM, WHETHER THE STUDENT'S SCHOOL OF ORIGIN OR OTHERWISE.(3) THE NUMBER OF DAYS THE STUDENT EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS WAS TRANSPORTED TO OR FROM THE SCHOOL ENTITY.(b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, each school entity entitled to reimbursement on account of pupil transportation shall provide in a format and uniform standard prescribed by the Department of Education, AND IN A METHOD THAT IS NOT REDUNDANT OR OVERLY BURDENSOME FOR SCHOOL ENTITIES, a detailed breakdown of pupil transportation expenditures as follows:(1) For the expenditures reported under subsection (a)(3) (iii) (A)(3)(II) : (i) The name of each charter school to which a school entity 20250HB1326PN1647 - 6 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transported resident students.(ii) The number of charter school students the school entity transported to each charter school listed under subparagraph (i).(iii) The transportation expenditures applicable to each charter school listed under subparagraph (i).(2) For the expenditures reported under subsection (a)(4) (iii) (A)(4)(II) : (i) The name of each nonpublic school to which a school entity transported resident students.(ii) The number of nonpublic school students the school entity transported to each nonpublic school listed under subparagraph (i).(iii) The transportation expenditures applicable to each nonpublic school listed under subparagraph (i).(3) FOR THE EXPENDITURES REPORTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(6)(II):(I) THE NAME OF EACH SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL LOCATED OUTSIDE OF THE BOUNDARIES OF THIS COMMONWEALTH TO WHICH A SCHOOL ENTITY TRANSPORTED RESIDENT STUDENTS.(II) THE TRANSPORTATION EXPENDITURES APPLICABLE TO EACH SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL LOCATED OUTSIDE OF THE BOUNDARIES OF THIS COMMONWEALTH LISTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I).(c) The Department of Education shall annually post on its publicly accessible Internet website the information and data collected under this section.(d) The Department of Education shall notify the chairman and minority chairman of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chairman and minority chairman of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairman and 20250HB1326PN1647 - 7 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 minority chairman of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairman and minority chairman of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives when the information is posted under subsection (c).(E) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION:"EXTRAORDINARY TRANSPORTATION EXPENSES" SHALL MEAN WHEELCHAIR BUS, VAN OR TRANSPORTATION ESTABLISHED IN DIRECT RESPONSE TO THE SEVERE HEALTH NEEDS OF AN INDIVIDUAL STUDENT.Section 3. Any regulation inconsistent with the amendment or addition of sections 1366 and 2541.1 of the act is abrogated to the extent of the inconsistency.Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB1326PN1647 - 8 - <--1234567891011121314